Idaho statutes. Title 40 HIGHWAYS AND BRIDGES
Chapter 28
BEAUTIFICATION OF STATE HIGHWAYS

Sec.

§ 40-2801, 40-2802. Authority of board — Acquisition of land. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2803 — 40-2809. [Reserved.]

Tourist related advertising devices. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2811 — 40-2829. Advertising near highways — Application of act — Licenses — Fees — General prohibitions. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2830. Removal of displays. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2831 — 40-2836. Compensation for removal — Information centers — Local ordinances — Nuisances — Enforcement. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2837. Penalty. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2838. Remedies cumulative. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2839 — 40-2850. [Reserved.]

§ 40-2810. Legislative policy

§ 40-2851 — 40-2860. Junkyards as public nuisances — Licenses — Fees — Violations — Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]